District of Columbia statutes.
22-3010.01

Misdemeanor sexual abuse of a child or minor.

(a)

Whoever, being 18 years of age or older and more than 4 years older than a child, or being 18 years of age or older and being in a significant relationship with a minor, engages in sexually suggestive conduct with that child or minor shall be imprisoned for not more than 180 days, or fined not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01, or both.

(b)

For the purposes of this section, the term “sexually suggestive conduct” means engaging in any of the following acts in a way which is intended to cause or reasonably causes the sexual arousal or sexual gratification of any person:

(1)

Touching a child or minor inside his or her clothing;

(2)

Touching a child or minor inside or outside his or her clothing close to the genitalia, anus, breast, or buttocks;

(3)

Placing one’s tongue in the mouth of the child or minor; or

(4)

Touching one’s own genitalia or that of a third person.

May 23, 1995, D.C. Law 10-257, § 209a
as added Apr. 24, 2007, D.C. Law 16-306, § 216(e), 53 DCR 8610
June 11, 2013, D.C. Law 19-317, § 232(m), 60 DCR 2064
This section is referenced in § 22-4151 and § 23-581.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-317 substituted “not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01” for “in an amount not to exceed $1,000” in (a).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 216(e) of Omnibus Public Safety Emergency Amendment Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-445, July 19, 2006, 53 DCR 6443).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 216(e) of Omnibus Public Safety Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-490, October 18, 2006, 53 DCR 8686).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 216(e) of Omnibus Public Safety Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-10, January 16, 2007, 54 DCR 1479).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 216(e) of Omnibus Public Safety Second Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-25, April 19, 2007, 54 DCR 4036).
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 511(a) of Public Safety Legislation Sixty-Day Layover Emergency Amendment Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-693, January 18, 2011, 58 DCR 640).
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 511(a) of Public Safety Legislation Sixty-Day Layover Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2011 (D.C. Act 19-45, April 20, 2011, 58 DCR 3701).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 232(m) of the Criminal Fine Proportionality Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-45, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5400, 20 DCSTAT 1300).
Applicability of D.C. Law 19-317: Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-317 provided that the act shall apply only to offenses committed on or after June 11, 2013.